District of Columbia statutes.
49-211

Liability of officer’s estate for property lost, injured, or destroyed.

Compensation for any public property defaced, injured, lost, or destroyed through the neglect or default of a deceased officer may be recovered from his estate in the manner provided in § 49-205.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 38
1981 Ed., § 39-211.
1973 Ed., § 39-511.